Louisiana, session 2026, HB974.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 316(9) and (10) and 319(A) are
hereby amended and reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure Article 316(11) is hereby
enacted to read as follows:
Art. 316. Factors in fixing amount of bail
The amount of bail shall be fixed in an amount that will ensure the presence
of the defendant, as required, and the safety of any other person and the community,
having regard to:
* * *
(9) The presumption of innocence until the defendant is proven guilty.
(9)(10) Any other circumstances affecting the probability of the defendant's
appearance.
(10)(11) The type or form of bail.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1396 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 974
Art. 319. Modifications of bail
A.(1) The court having trial jurisdiction over the offense charged, on its own
motion or on motion of the prosecuting attorney or defendant, for good cause, may
either increase or reduce the amount of bail, or require new or additional security.
For purposes of this Article, good cause for increase of bail specifically includes but
is not limited to the rearrest of the defendant on offenses alleged to have been
committed while out on a bail undertaking. The modification of any bail order
wherein a bail undertaking has been posted by a criminal defendant and his sureties
shall upon the modification terminate the liability of the defendant and his sureties
under the previously existing bail undertaking. A new bail undertaking must shall
be posted in the amount of the new bail order.
(2) When a motion to reduce the amount of bail is filed, the motion shall be
heard no later than thirty days after the motion is filed unless good cause is shown
by the state or the court.
* * *